District of Columbia statutes.
7-247

Relation to other laws.

If a civil or criminal penalty imposed by another law applies to an action that is also subject to a civil or criminal penalty under this chapter, the greater penalty shall apply.

Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 107, 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(a), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).